North Carolina statutes. Chapter 129. Public Buildings and Grounds.
Article 2A. State Legislative Building.

§ 129-12.1.
Official name.

The building constructed under the direction of the State Legislative Building Commission in Raleigh, and which is used to house the legislative branch of the State government is officially designated as the State Legislative Building, and all references in publications issued by the State of North Carolina or any agency, department or institution thereof shall refer to the building as the State Legislative Building.

History.

1963, c. 8.

Editor’s Note.

Article 2.1 was renumbered as Article 2A pursuant to Session Laws 1997-456, s. 27, which authorized the Revisor of Statutes to renumber or reletter sections and parts of sections having a number or letter designation that is incompatible with the General Assembly’s computer database.